Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 42.45.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“authority” means the Alaska Energy Authority;

“feasibility study”

means a study conducted to establish the economic and environmental practicality of completing a proposed power project;

includes engineering and design work to meet the requirements for submission of a license application for a proposed new project to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;

“power” includes electrical energy generated, distributed, bought, or sold for lighting, heating, power, and every other useful purpose;

“power project” or “project” means a plant, works, system, or facility, together with related or necessary facilities and appurtenances, including a divided or undivided interest in or a right to the capacity of a power project or project, that is used or is useful for the purpose of

electrical or thermal energy production;

waste energy utilization and energy conservation; or

transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, and interchange of electrical or thermal energy, including district heating or interties;

“reconnaissance study” means a study conducted to assess the present and future electrical and thermal energy needs of an area.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993; am §§ 49, 84 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as (6). Renumbered in 1999.